Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1177.
do enact as follows:SB1177,11Section 1. 6.875 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1177,3,1216.875 (5) Prior to entering upon his or her duties, each individual appointed 2to serve as a deputy under this section shall file the oath required by s. 7.30 (5). In 3the oath, the individual shall swear that he or she is qualified to act as a deputy 4under this section, that he or she has read the statutes governing absentee voting, 5that he or she understands the proper absentee voting procedure, that he or she 6understands the penalties for noncompliance with the procedure under s. 12.13, 7that his or her sacred obligation will be to fully and fairly implement the absentee 8voting law and seek to have the intent of the electors ascertained. In addition, the 9oath shall state that the individual realizes that any error in conducting the voting 10procedure may result in invalidation of an elector’s vote under s. 7.51 (2) (e) and 11that the individual realizes that absentee voting is a privilege and not a 12constitutional right. The form of the oath shall be prescribed by the commission.SB1177,213Section 2. 7.08 (6) of the statutes is renumbered 7.08 (6) (a).SB1177,314Section 3. 7.08 (6) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1177,3,18157.08 (6) (b) The commission shall permit the error‑rate assessment required 16under par. (a) to be derived from an appropriately designed batch-level comparison, 17as defined in s. 7.58 (1) (b), that meets the commission’s minimum standards 18established under s. 7.58 (5) (e).SB1177,419Section 4. 7.51 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1177,4,14207.51 (2) (e) Except in municipalities where absentee ballots are canvassed 21under s. 7.52 and except as provided under par. (em), if after any ballots have been 22laid aside, the number of ballots still exceeds the total number of electors recorded 23on the poll list, the inspectors shall separate the absentee ballots from the other 24ballots. If there is an excess number of absentee ballots, the inspectors shall place 1the absentee ballots in the ballot box and one of the inspectors shall publicly and 2without examination draw therefrom by chance the number of ballots equal to the 3excess number of absentee ballots. If there is an excess number of nonabsentee 4ballots, the inspectors shall place those ballots in the ballot box and one of the 5inspectors shall publicly and without examination draw therefrom by chance the 6number of ballots equal to the excess number of those ballots. All ballots so 7removed may not be counted but shall be specially marked as having been removed 8by the inspectors on original canvass due to an excess number of ballots, set aside 9and preserved. When the number of ballots and total shown on the poll list agree, 10the inspectors shall return all ballots to be counted to the ballot box and shall turn 11the ballot box in such manner as to thoroughly mix the ballots. The inspectors shall 12then open, count and record the number of votes. When the ballots are counted, the 13inspectors shall separate them into piles for ballots similarly voted. Objections may 14be made to placement of ballots in the piles at the time the separation is made.SB1177,515Section 5. 7.51 (2) (e) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 16(this act), is repealed.SB1177,617Section 6. 7.51 (2) (em) of the statutes is created to read:SB1177,4,21187.51 (2) (em) 1. Beginning on January 1, 2026, the process under par. (e) does 19not apply to selected contests, as defined s. 7.58 (1) (g), subject to risk-limiting 20audits under s. 7.58 (2), and, instead, the inspectors shall use the process under 21subd. 3. for those selected contests.SB1177,4,23222. Beginning on April 1, 2027, the inspectors shall use the process under subd. 233. for all elections.SB1177,5,14243. If after any ballots have been laid aside, the number of ballots still exceeds 1the total number of electors recorded on the poll list, the inspectors shall document 2the discrepancy in detail, including the number and type of excess ballots, on the 3original canvass. The inspectors shall return all ballots to be counted to the ballot 4box and shall turn the ballot box in such manner as to thoroughly mix the ballots. 5The inspectors shall then open, count, and record the number of votes. When the 6ballots are counted, the inspectors shall separate them into piles for ballots 7similarly voted. Objections may be made to placement of ballots in the piles at the 8time the separation is made. Any documented discrepancy in the number and type 9of excess ballots under this paragraph shall be factored into the risk-limiting audit 10procedures under s. 7.58 (4). If the discrepancy exceeds 0.5 percent of the total 11ballots cast in the audit unit, as defined under s. 7.58 (1) (a), the commission shall 12conduct an investigation into the cause of the discrepancy. For purposes of this 13paragraph, the commission shall develop ballot reconciliation procedures that 14preserve all legally cast ballots and maintain election integrity.SB1177,715Section 7. 7.51 (2) (em) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 16.... (this act), is repealed.SB1177,817Section 8. 7.51 (2) (em) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 18.... (this act), is repealed.SB1177,919Section 9. 7.51 (2) (em) 3. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 20.... (this act), is renumbered 7.51 (2) (em).SB1177,1021Section 10. 7.52 (4) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1177,6,12227.52 (4) (e) If Except as provided in par. (em), if, after any ballots have been 23set aside, the number of ballots still exceeds the total number of electors recorded 24on the poll list, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall place the absentee 1ballots in the ballot box and one of the members shall publicly and without 2examination draw therefrom by chance the number of ballots equal to the excess 3number of ballots. All ballots so removed shall not be counted but shall be specially 4marked as having been removed by the board of absentee ballot canvassers on 5original canvass due to an excess number of ballots, set aside, and preserved. When 6the number of ballots and total shown on the poll list agree, the board of absentee 7ballot canvassers shall return all ballots to be counted to the ballot box and shall 8turn the ballot box in such manner as to thoroughly mix the ballots. The board of 9absentee ballot canvassers shall then open, count, and record the number of votes. 10When the ballots are counted, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall 11separate them into piles for ballots similarly voted. Objections may be made to 12placement of ballots in the piles at the time the separation is made.SB1177,1113Section 11. 7.52 (4) (e) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 14(this act), is repealed.SB1177,1215Section 12. 7.52 (4) (em) of the statutes is created to read:SB1177,6,19167.52 (4) (em) 1. Beginning on January 1, 2026, the process under par. (e) does 17not apply to selected contests, as defined s. 7.58 (1) (g), subject to risk-limiting 18audits under 7.58 (2), and, instead, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall 19use the process under subd. 3. for those selected contests.SB1177,6,21202. Beginning on April 1, 2027, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall 21use the process under subd. 3. for all elections.SB1177,7,14223. If after any ballots have been laid aside, the number of ballots still exceeds 23the total number of electors recorded on the poll list, the board of absentee ballot 24canvassers shall document the discrepancy in detail, including the number and 1type of excess ballots, on the original canvass. The board of absentee ballot 2canvassers shall return all ballots to be counted to the ballot box and shall turn the 3ballot box in such manner as to thoroughly mix the ballots. The board of absentee 4ballot canvassers shall then open, count, and record the number of votes. When the 5ballots are counted, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall separate them 6into piles for ballots similarly voted. Objections may be made to placement of 7ballots in the piles at the time the separation is made. Any documented 8discrepancy in the number and type of excess ballots under this paragraph shall be 9factored into the risk-limiting audit procedures under s. 7.58 (4). If the discrepancy 10exceeds 0.5 percent of the total ballots cast in the audit unit, as defined under s. 117.58 (1) (a), the commission shall conduct an investigation into the cause of the 12discrepancy. For purposes of this paragraph, the commission shall develop ballot 13reconciliation procedures that preserve all legally cast ballots and maintain election 14integrity.SB1177,1315Section 13. 7.52 (4) (em) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 16.... (this act), is repealed.SB1177,1417Section 14. 7.52 (4) (em) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 18.... (this act), is repealed.SB1177,1519Section 15. 7.52 (4) (em) 3. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 20.... (this act), is renumbered 7.52 (4) (em).SB1177,1621Section 16. 7.58 of the statutes is created to read:SB1177,7,22227.58 Risk-limiting audits. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1177,8,223(a) “Audit unit” means a ward, election district, reporting unit, batch, scanner 1feed, or other unit of vote aggregation used by a county to report electronic voting 2system or voting machine vote totals.SB1177,8,43(b) “Batch-level comparison” means a risk-limiting audit for which all of the 4following apply:SB1177,8,651. The reported vote count of each audit unit is compared to a manual vote 6count of the same audit unit.SB1177,8,972. The discrepancies between the reported vote count and manual vote count 8of each audit unit are used to determine whether the audit should examine 9additional audit units.SB1177,8,11103. The audit continues until either the risk limit is met or a full manual vote 11count of the reported vote count for the election is conducted.SB1177,8,1612(c) “Cast vote record” means a machine-generated and machine-readable 13record for an individual ballot or ballot position that lists the vote choice for each 14contest on that ballot or position, together with an audit unit identifier and a ballot 15identifier or batch and position identifier. A “cast vote record” does not include 16information that reasonably could be used to identify the elector who cast the ballot. SB1177,8,1917(d) “Incorrect outcome” means an outcome that is inconsistent with the 18election outcome that would be obtained by conducting a manual count of paper 19ballots.SB1177,8,2120(e) “Risk limit” means the largest statistical probability that an incorrect 21outcome is not detected or corrected in a risk-limiting audit.SB1177,9,322(f) “Risk-limiting audit” means an audit protocol that uses statistical methods 23to limit to acceptable levels the risk of certifying a preliminary election outcome 24that is an incorrect outcome. A “risk-limiting audit” includes manual vote counts of 1paper ballots from one or more audit units and requires persons conducting the 2audit to ascertain elector intent, as provided under s. 7.50, when examining ballot 3marks.SB1177,9,114(g) “Selected contest” means a contested statewide election for a candidate or 5referendum that garners the most total votes and, if available at the same election, 6at least one additional contested statewide election for a candidate or referendum 7that is randomly selected by the commission at a public meeting. “Selected contest” 8does not include a contested statewide election for which the difference between the 9votes cast for the leading candidate and those cast for the candidate trailing the 10leading candidate or the difference between the affirmative and negative votes cast 11upon any referendum question is not more than 0.25 percent of the total votes cast. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1177 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1177 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1177 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1177 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1177: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting